Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 26 of Title 20, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No member of the Judicial Nominating Commission who is
related to an applicant for any position for which the Commission is
responsible to submit nominations to an appointing authority
pursuant to Section 3 of Article VII-B of the Constitution of the
State of Oklahoma shall participate in the decision-making process
with respect to such applicant if the Commission member is related
to the applicant within the third degree of consanguinity or
affinity. If a member of the Judicial Nominating Commission
participates in the decision-making process with respect to an
applicant in contravention of the requirement of this subsection,
the member shall be immediately removed from the Commission and

shall be permanently forbidden from being appointed to the
Commission.
B. No later than ten (10) days after receiving the final list
of applications for an open position which is set to come before the
Judicial Nominating Commission, a member of the Judicial Nominating
Commission shall make full disclosure of the date and amount of any
contribution made by such member to the judicial campaign of any
person making application to the Commission for their possible
nomination to an appointing authority pursuant to the provisions of
Section 3 of Article VII-B of the Constitution of the State of
Oklahoma. The Administrative Director of the Courts shall prescribe
a form to be used for such purpose. The completed forms shall be
posted in a conspicuous manner on a website maintained by or on
behalf of the Judicial Nominating Commission and shall be accessible
until the position for which nominations are to be submitted by the
Commission has been filled.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 27 of Title 20, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
With respect to members of the Oklahoma Bar Association who may
be eligible for appointment or election to the Judicial Nominating
Commission, the address for the person as reflected in the records
of the State Election Board shall be used for purposes of
determining the residence of such person for purposes of eligibility
for membership on the Judicial Nominating Commission.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2103 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 8th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2103 Page 3